Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-171] Delegation of authority by the
governor; rulemaking authority of governor. (a) The governor may delegate
any authority vested in the governor under this chapter, and may provide for
the subdelegation of any such authority, except the power given the governor by
sections 124A-36 and 124A-41.

(b) The governor, in accordance with chapter
91, may adopt such rules as the governor may deem necessary to administer and
implement this chapter. Any rules required to be adopted by any provision in this
chapter shall be adopted in accordance with chapter 91. Chapter 91 shall apply
notwithstanding section 121-5 or any other contrary provision of law. [L 1982,
c 171, pt of §2; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next